Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.440

Change of name, address, type of entity, or jurisdiction of formation by commercial registered agent.

(1) If a commercial registered agent changes its name, its address as listed under RCW 23.95.420(1), its type of entity, or its jurisdiction of formation, the agent shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change executed by the agent which states:

(a) The name of the agent as listed under RCW 23.95.420(1);

(b) If the name of the agent has changed, the new name;

(c) If the address of the agent has changed, the new address; and

(d) If the agent is an entity:

(i) If the type of entity of the agent has changed, the new type of entity; and

(ii) If the jurisdiction of formation of the agent has changed, the new jurisdiction of formation.

(2) The filing by the secretary of state of a statement of change under subsection (1) of this section is effective to change the information regarding the agent with respect to each entity represented by the agent.

(3) A commercial registered agent promptly shall furnish to each entity represented by it a notice in a record of the filing by the secretary of state of a statement of change relating to the name or address of the agent and the changes made in the statement.

(4) If a commercial registered agent changes its address without delivering for filing a statement of change as required by this section, the secretary of state may cancel the listing of the agent under RCW 23.95.420. A cancellation under this subsection has the same effect as a termination under RCW 23.95.425. Promptly after canceling the listing of an agent, the secretary of state shall serve notice in a record in the manner provided in RCW 23.95.450 (2) or (3) on:

(a) Each entity represented by the agent, stating that the agent has ceased to be the registered agent for the entity and that, until the entity designates a new registered agent, service of process may be made on the entity as provided in RCW 23.95.450; and

(b) The agent, stating that the listing of the agent has been canceled under this section.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1409.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.